Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 2. Injuries to Other Property

§§ 3721-3728.
Repealed.
1971, No. 222 (Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 3729.
Fire protection apparatus.

A person who without lawful authority tampers or interferes with a main, hydrant, gate, or other fire protection apparatus of a municipal water system or with the fire protection apparatus of a private water system used for municipal purposes shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 or imprisoned not more than 10 years, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§§ 3730,
3731.
Repealed.
1971, No. 222 (Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 3732.
Unauthorized removal of books from library.

A person who removes from a free public library, or a free town, village, or traveling library, a book, paper, magazine, document, or other reading matter, or an art book, picture, print, plate, or other art work, kept in such library for public use or circulation, without the consent of the librarian or other person in charge of such library, shall be fined not more than
$50.00 for each offense, half to the use of the library from which the same was so removed, and the other half to the use of the treasury liable for the costs of prosecution.

§ 3733.
Mills, dams or bridges.

A person who willfully and maliciously injures, removes, or opens a dam, reservoir, gate, or flume or injures or removes the wheels, mill gear, or machinery of a water mill, or injures, removes, or destroys a public or toll bridge, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§§ 3734-3737.
Repealed.
1971, No. 222 (Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 3738.
Obstruction and use of private roads and lands by motor vehicle.

A person who, by use of a motor vehicle as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4:

obstructs a private driveway, barway, or gateway; or

travels over a private road that is so marked, or travels over other private lands; or

enters on private lands for the purpose of camping; without the permission of the owner or occupant shall be fined not more than $500.00.

HISTORY:

Added 1967, No. 173; amended 1971, No. 95, § 1, eff. April 22, 1971.

§ 3739.
Operation of vehicles on state owned land.

A person who operates a motor vehicle, as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4, on any land that is owned or held by the State:

except in places or on trails specifically designated and marked by the Secretary of Natural Resources; or

contrary to any rule governing the use of the place or trail shall be fined not more than $500.00. For the purposes of this section “land owned or held by the State” does not include a highway as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4.

The Secretary of Natural Resources may by rule designate a place or trail for use by motor vehicles when it finds that natural, fish and wildlife, and other recreational activities or aesthetic values will not be substantially adversely affected. The Secretary may by rule specify under which weather and trail conditions or at which times or hours of the day designated trails or places may not be used.

HISTORY:

Added 1971, No. 95, § 2, eff. April 22, 1971; amended 1987, No. 76, § 18.

§ 3740.
Damage to State land.

A person who operates a motor vehicle, as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4, on any land, that is owned or held by the State, in such a manner as to purposely and maliciously cause injury, damage, erosion or waste to the land shall be fined not more than $500.00.
For the purposes of this section “land” does not include a highway as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4.

HISTORY:

Added 1971, No. 95, § 3, eff. April 22, 1971.